Missouri, session 2026, SB926.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 452.305 and 452.310, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 452.305 and 452.310, to read as follows:
452.305. 1. The court shall enter a judgment of
dissolution of marriage if:
(1) The court finds that one of the parties has been a
resident of this state, or is a member of the armed services
who has been stationed in this state, for ninety days
immediately preceding the commencement of the proceeding and
that thirty days have elapsed since the filing of the
petition; and
(2) The court finds that there remains no reasonable
likelihood that the marriage can be preserved and that
therefore the marriage is irretrievably broken; and
(3) To the extent it has jurisdiction, the court has
considered and made provision for child custody, the support
of each child, the maintenance of either spouse and the
disposition of property.
2. The court shall enter a judgment of legal
separation if:

SB 926 2
(1) The court finds that one of the parties has been a
resident of this state, or is a member of the armed services
who has been stationed in this state, for ninety days
immediately preceding the commencement of the proceeding and
that thirty days have elapsed since the filing of the
petition; and
(2) The court finds that there remains a reasonable
likelihood that the marriage can
be preserved and that therefore the marriage is not
irretrievably broken; and
(3) To the extent it has jurisdiction, the court has
considered and made provision for the custody and the
support of each child, the maintenance of either spouse and
the disposition of property.
3. Pregnancy status shall not prevent the court from
entering a judgment of dissolution of marriage or legal
separation.
4. Any judgment of dissolution of marriage or legal
separation shall include the last four digits of the Social
Security numbers of the parties. The full Social Security
number of each party and each child shall be retained in the
manner required under section 509.520.
452.310. 1. In any proceeding commenced pursuant to
this chapter, the petition, a motion to modify, a motion for
a family access order and a motion for contempt shall be
verified. The petition in a proceeding for dissolution of
marriage shall allege that the marriage is irretrievably
broken and that therefore there remains no reasonable
likelihood that the marriage can be preserved. The petition
in a proceeding for legal separation shall allege that the
marriage is not irretrievably broken and that therefore

SB 926 3
there remains a reasonable likelihood that the marriage can
be preserved.
2. The petition in a proceeding for dissolution of
marriage or legal separation shall set forth:
(1) The residence of each party, including the county,
and the length of residence of each party in this state and
in the county of residence;
(2) The date of the marriage and the place at which it
is registered;
(3) The date on which the parties separated;
(4) The name, age, and address of each child, and the
parent with whom each child has primarily resided for the
sixty days immediately preceding the filing of the petition
for dissolution of marriage or legal separation;
(5) Whether the wife is pregnant; however, pregnancy
status shall not prevent the court from entering a judgment
of dissolution of marriage or legal separation;
(6) The last four digits of the Social Security number
of the petitioner, respondent and each child;
(7) Any arrangements as to the custody and support of
the children and the maintenance of each party; and
(8) The relief sought.
3. Upon the filing of the petition in a proceeding for
dissolution of marriage or legal separation, each child
shall immediately be subject to the jurisdiction of the
court in which the proceeding is commenced, unless a
proceeding involving allegations of abuse or neglect of the
child is pending in juvenile court. Until permitted by
order of the court, neither parent shall remove any child
from the jurisdiction of the court or from any parent with
whom the child has primarily resided for the sixty days

SB 926 4
immediately preceding the filing of a petition for
dissolution of marriage or legal separation.
4. The mere fact that one parent has actual possession
of the child at the time of filing shall not create a
preference in favor of such parent in any judicial
determination regarding custody of the child.
5. The respondent shall be served in the manner
provided by the rules of the supreme court and applicable
court rules and, to avoid an interlocutory judgment of
default, shall file a verified answer within thirty days of
the date of service which shall not only admit or deny the
allegations of the petition, but shall also set forth:
(1) The last four digits of the Social Security number
of the petitioner, respondent and each child;
(2) Any arrangements as to the custody and support of
the child and the maintenance of each party; and
(3) The relief sought.
6. Previously existing defenses to divorce and legal
separation, including but not limited to condonation,
connivance, collusion, recrimination, insanity, and lapse of
time, are abolished.
7. The full Social Security number of each party and
each child and the date of birth of each child shall be
provided in the manner required under section 509.520.
8. The petitioner and respondent shall submit a
proposed parenting plan, either individually or jointly,
within thirty days after service of process or the filing of
the entry of appearance, whichever event first occurs of a
motion to modify or a petition involving custody or
visitation issues. The proposed parenting plan shall set
forth the arrangements that the party believes to be in the

SB 926 5
best interest of the minor children and shall include but
not be limited to:
(1) A specific written schedule detailing the custody,
visitation and residential time for each child with each
party including:
(a) Major holidays stating which holidays a party has
each year;
(b) School holidays for school-age children;
(c) The child's birthday, Mother's Day and Father's
Day;
(d) Weekday and weekend schedules and for school-age
children how the winter, spring, summer and other vacations
from school will be spent;
(e) The times and places for transfer of the child
between the parties in connection with the residential
schedule;
(f) A plan for sharing transportation duties
associated with the residential schedule;
(g) Appropriate times for telephone access;
(h) Suggested procedures for notifying the other party
when a party requests a temporary variation from the
residential schedule;
(i) Any suggested restrictions or limitations on
access to a party and the reasons such restrictions are
requested;
(2) A specific written plan regarding legal custody
which details how the decision-making rights and
responsibilities will be shared between the parties
100 including the following:
101 (a) Educational decisions and methods of communicating
102 information from the school to both parties;

SB 926 6
103 (b) Medical, dental and health care decisions
104 including how health care providers will be selected and a
105 method of communicating medical conditions of the child and
106 how emergency care will be handled;
107 (c) Extracurricular activities, including a method for
108 determining which activities the child will participate in
109 when those activities involve time during which each party
110 is the custodian;
111 (d) Child care providers, including how such providers
112 will be selected;
113 (e) Communication procedures including access to
114 telephone numbers as appropriate;
115 (f) A dispute resolution procedure for those matters
116 on which the parties disagree or in interpreting the
117 parenting plan;
118 (g) If a party suggests no shared decision-making, a
119 statement of the reasons for such a request;
120 (3) How the expenses of the child, including child
121 care, educational and extraordinary expenses as defined in
122 the child support guidelines established by the supreme
123 court, will be paid including:
124 (a) The suggested amount of child support to be paid
125 by each party;
126 (b) The party who will maintain or provide health
127 insurance for the child and how the medical, dental, vision,
128 psychological and other health care expenses of the child
129 not paid by insurance will be paid by the parties;
130 (c) The payment of educational expenses, if any;
131 (d) The payment of extraordinary expenses of the
132 child, if any;
133 (e) Child care expenses, if any;
134 (f) Transportation expenses, if any.

SB 926 7
135 9. If the proposed parenting plans of the parties
136 differ and the parties cannot resolve the differences or if
137 any party fails to file a proposed parenting plan, upon
138 motion of either party and an opportunity for the parties to
139 be heard, the court shall enter a temporary order containing
140 a parenting plan setting forth the arrangements specified in
141 subsection 8 of this section which will remain in effect
142 until further order of the court. The temporary order
143 entered by the court shall not create a preference for the
144 court in its adjudication of final custody, child support or
145 visitation.
146 10. The Missouri supreme court shall have guidelines
147 for a parenting plan which may be used by the parties
148 pursuant to this section in any dissolution of marriage,
149 legal separation or modification proceeding involving issues
150 of custody and visitation relating to the child. Parenting
151 plan guidelines shall be made available on the office of
152 state courts administrator's website.
153 11. The filing of a parenting plan for any child over
154 the age of eighteen for whom custody, visitation, or support
155 is being established or modified by a court of competent
156 jurisdiction is not required. Nothing in this section shall
157 be construed as precluding the filing of a parenting plan
158 upon agreement of the parties or if ordered to do so by the
159 court for any child over the age of eighteen for whom
160 custody, visitation, or support is being established or
161 modified by a court of competent jurisdiction.
✓